Nebraska, session 109, LB412.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB412 LB412
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 43-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-1401 For purposes of sections 43-1401 to 43-1418:
(1) Except as provided in subsection (3) of section 43-1411, child
means Child shall mean a child under the age of eighteen years born out
of wedlock;
(2) Child born out of wedlock means shall mean a child whose parents
were not married to each other at the time of its birth, except that a
child shall not be considered as born out of wedlock if the its parents
were married at the time of the child's its conception but divorced at
the time of its birth. The definition of legitimacy or illegitimacy for
other purposes shall not be affected by the provisions of such sections
43-1401 to 43-1418; and
(3) Support includes shall include reasonable education.
Sec. 2. Section 43-1411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-1411 (1) A civil proceeding to establish the paternity of a child
may be instituted, in the court of the district where the child is
domiciled or found or, for cases under the Uniform Interstate Family
Support Act, where the alleged father is domiciled, by:
(a) The mother or the alleged father of such child, either during
pregnancy or within four years after the child's birth, unless:
(i) A valid consent or relinquishment has been made pursuant to
sections 43-104.08 to 43-104.24 or section 43-105 for purposes of
adoption; or
(ii) A county court or separate juvenile court has jurisdiction over
the custody of the child or jurisdiction over an adoption matter with
respect to such child pursuant to sections 43-101 to 43-116; or
(b) The guardian or next friend of such child or the state, either
during pregnancy or within eighteen years after the child's birth.
(2) Summons shall issue and be served as in other civil proceedings,
-2-

LB412 LB412
2025 2025
except that such summons may be directed to the sheriff of any county in
the state and may be served in any county.
(3)(a) (3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person
claiming to be the biological father of a child over which the juvenile
court already has jurisdiction may file a complaint to intervene in such
juvenile proceeding to institute an action to establish the paternity of
the child. The complaint to intervene shall be accompanied by an
affidavit under oath that the complainant affiant believes he is the
biological father of the juvenile. No filing fee shall be charged for
filing the complaint and affidavit.
(b) Upon filing of the complaint and affidavit, the juvenile court
may shall enter an order pursuant to section 43-1414 to require genetic
testing and to require the juvenile to be made available for genetic
testing. The costs of genetic testing shall be paid by the complainant
intervenor, the county, or the state at the discretion of the juvenile
court.
(c) This subsection does not authorize intervention by a person
whose parental rights to such child have been terminated by the order of
any court of competent jurisdiction.
(d) In determining whether to order genetic testing or establish
paternity pursuant to this subsection, the juvenile court may consider:
(i) The child's age;
(ii) The relationship between the child and any presumptive parent;
(iii) The relationship between the child and any parent whose rights
have been established by acknowledgment or court finding;
(iv) The relationship between the child and the complainant;
(v) Whether the child could benefit or be harmed by establishing the
complainant's paternity; and
(vi) Any other factor the juvenile court, in its discretion, deems
relevant.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, child means a person under the
-3-

LB412 LB412
2025 2025
age of eighteen years, regardless of whether the person was born out of
wedlock.
Sec. 3. Original section 43-1401, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, and section 43-1411, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, are repealed.
-4-